North Dakota, session 69, SB2015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
department of corrections and rehabilitation for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the
department of corrections and rehabilitation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Adult services $265,998,440 $174,577,338 $440,575,778
Youth services 26,853,221 9,349,903 36,203,124
New and vacant FTE pool 0 15,248,196 15,248,196
Total all funds $292,851,661 $199,175,437 $492,027,098
Less other funds 45,744,746 101,911,978 147,656,724
Total general fund $247,106,915 $97,263,459 $344,370,374
Full-time equivalent positions 929.79 34.50 964.29
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO THE
SEVENTIETH LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items
included in the appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget
for the 2027-29 biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the
seventieth legislative assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One - Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Heart River correctional center $36,742 $35,635,000 $35,671,742
Missouri River correctional center 121,136 8,032,757 8,153,893
temporary housing unit
Payments to county and regional jails 28,430,210 0 28,430,210
Deferred maintenance and extraordinary 0 13,006,609 13,006,609
repairs
New FTE costs 40,000 0 40,000
James River correctional center study 0 750,000 750,000
Missouri River correctional center planning 0 20,000,000 20,000,000
and design
Software systems and technology 0 9,750,000 9,750,000
upgrades
Equipment 0 2,079,700 2,079,700
Victims of crime grants 0 7,000,000 7,000,000
Mental health assessments and services 0 550,000 550,000
Rough rider industries equipment and 0 13,722,181 13,722,181
supplies
Workforce training and education 0 1,027,500 1,027,500
James River correctional center 0 570,000 570,000

S. B. NO. 2015 - PAGE 2
maintenance building demolition
Total $28,628,088 $112,123,747 $140,751,835
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
department of corrections and rehabilitation may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant
FTE pool line item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to
transfer funds from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the adult services and youth services line
items in accordance with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as
approved by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND. The
other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $95,834,175 from the strategic
investment and improvements fund for one-time projects and programs as follows:
Heart River correctional center project $35,635,000
Missouri River correctional center temporary housing 8,032,757
Missouri River correctional center planning and design 20,000,000
James River correctional center facilities study 750,000
James River correctional center maintenance building demolition 570,000
Deferred maintenance and extraordinary repairs 13,006,609
Software and technology upgrades 9,750,000
Equipment 1,089,809
Victims of crime grants 7,000,000
Total $95,834,175
SECTION 5. OTHER FUNDS - FEDERAL FUNDS - CONTINGENT BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA
LINE OF CREDIT - DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND REHABILITATION. The other funds line
item in section 1 of this Act includes $989,891 from federal funds or proceeds from a line of credit for
purchasing tasers, body cameras, and ballistic vests. If the department of corrections and rehabilitation
is unsuccessful in obtaining a federal grant of $989,891 for this purpose and notifies the office of
management and budget that it will not receive federal funds for this purpose during the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, the department of corrections and rehabilitation may
borrow up to $989,891 through a line of credit from the Bank of North Dakota for the purchase of tasers,
body cameras, and ballistic vests during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30,
2027. The interest rate on the line of credit may not exceed the prevailing interest rate charged to North
Dakota governmental entities. If the department of corrections and rehabilitation accesses the line of
credit, the department of corrections and rehabilitation shall request a deficiency appropriation from the
seventieth legislative assembly to repay the line of credit.
SECTION 6. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND REHABILITATION OPERATING FUND
REVENUES. Any moneys received by the department of corrections and rehabilitation from correctional
supervision, electronic monitoring, and detention; reimbursements from other agencies; profits received
from department of corrections and rehabilitation commissary; miscellaneous revenue, including
offender fines, fees, restitution, and medical copayments; and from the youth correctional center
permanent fund, may be deposited in the department of corrections and rehabilitation operating fund
and expended pursuant to legislative appropriation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 7. MISSOURI RIVER CORRECTIONAL CENTER PLANNING AND DESIGN -
STEERING COMMITTEE - LEGISLATIVE INTENT - REPORT. The appropriation in the adult services
line item in section 1 of this Act includes $20,000,000 from the strategic investment and improvements
fund for planning and design for a new minimum security male correctional facility for the Missouri River
correctional center. The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall establish a Missouri River
correctional center steering committee to oversee the design and construction of the new Missouri
River correctional center facility, including other options, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027. The committee must include one member of the senate appointed by the senate
majority leader, one member of the house appointed by the house majority leader, and one member of

S. B. NO. 2015 - PAGE 3
the minority party from either the senate or the house appointed by the minority leaders of the senate
and the house. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that the seventieth legislative
assembly consider supporting the completion of a new minimum security facility for the Missouri River
correctional center during the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2029. The
department of corrections and rehabilitation shall provide a quarterly report to the legislative
management regarding the planning and design of a new minimum security facility.
SECTION 8. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - DIVERSION AND DEFLECTION
CENTERS. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying the need
for diversion and deflection centers in the state. The study must include the appropriate involvement of
the state in the planning and establishment of diversion and deflection centers. The legislative
management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation required to
implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.
SECTION 9. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - SENTENCING, CORRECTIONS, AND
PAROLE OVERSIGHT. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study the
sentencing, correctional, and parole systems within the state, with a focus on improving transparency,
consistency, and outcomes in the administration of justice. The study must include a comprehensive
review of:
1. Sentencing requirements and incarceration impacts, including an evaluation of the potential
impacts of requiring offenders sentenced to the custody of the department of corrections and
rehabilitation to serve eighty-five percent of their terms in secured facilities. The study must
include:
a. Cost analyses;
b. Consideration of data and trends relating to criminal offenses and sentencing;
c. Consideration of recidivism trends;
d. Consideration of rehabilitation and re-entry opportunities;
e. Definitions of terms related to sentencing and incarceration; and
f. Safety and accountability measures for minimum security facilities and transitional
facilities.
2. The structure and function of the parole board, including provisions of chapter 12-59 and any
rules adopted by the parole board. The study must include:
a. Membership structure, appointment process, terms, quorum, and meeting transparency;
b. Parole eligibility requirements and determinations;
c. Victim rights and notification systems; and
d. The role and input of the department of corrections and rehabilitation in parole-related
matters.
The study may include input from:
1. The judicial branch, including district court judges regarding sentencing decisions;
2. State's attorney and defense attorneys regarding charging practices, plea negotiations, and
trial resources;
3. The department of corrections and rehabilitation regarding inmate classification, housing,
placement authority, and transitional services, including work or educational release;

S. B. NO. 2015 - PAGE 4
4. The parole board regarding parole eligibility and release decisions;
5. Law enforcement representatives, including the chiefs of police association, sheriff's
association, and attorney general's office, regarding impacts to public safety and local and
regional jails;
6. The league of cities and association of counties regarding impacts to public safety and local
and regional jails;
7. Justice-involved individuals regarding the impact of current and potential sentencing and
parole practices; and
8. Crime victims regarding the impact of sentencing.
The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation
required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.
SECTION 10. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The following appropriations are
not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and may be continued into the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027:
1. Any amounts remaining from funds transferred to the department of corrections and
rehabilitation for deferred maintenance and extraordinary repairs from funding appropriated
from the strategic investment and improvements fund to the office of management and budget
in section 1 of chapter 640 of the 2023 Special Session Session Laws.
2. Any amounts remaining from funds transferred to the department of corrections and
rehabilitation for deferred maintenance and extraordinary repairs from funding appropriated
from federal funds derived from the state fiscal recovery fund to the office of management and
budget in subsection 10 of section 1 of chapter 550 of the 2021 Special Session Session Laws
and continued pursuant to section 9 of chapter 15 of the 2023 Session Laws.
3. The sum of $131,200,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund
for the construction of a new Heart River correctional center in section 1 of chapter 15 of the
2023 Session Laws.
4. The sum of $307,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for
DOCSTARS maintenance in section 1 of chapter 15 of the 2023 Session Laws.
5. The sum of $2,000,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for
information technology needs in section 1 of chapter 15 of the 2023 Session Laws.

S. B. NO. 2015 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2015.
Senate Vote: Yeas 40 Nays 6 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 70 Nays 20 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State